Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-410
Campus buildings and facilities; revenue bonds; issuance; public purpose; exempt from taxation.

In exercising the powers granted it under sections 85-401 to 85-411, and in issuing revenue bonds as provided in sections 85-403 to 85-411, the board exercising such powers or issuing the bonds shall constitute and be and is hereby created as a public corporation organized for educational purposes and is declared to be a governmental subdivision and instrumentality of the State of Nebraska, and all bonds issued under the authority of sections 85-403 to 85-411, together with interest thereon, shall be wholly exempt from taxation.

Laws 1955, c. 352, § 8, p. 1077;

Laws 1969, c. 845, § 3, p. 3185.